District of Columbia statutes.
42-143

Notarial acts in the District.

(a)

A notarial act may be performed within the District by the following persons to the extent authorized by law:

(1)

A notary public of the District;

(2)

A judge, clerk, or deputy clerk of any court of the District; or

(3)

Any other person authorized to perform the specific act.

(b)

Notarial acts performed within the District under federal authority as provided in § 42-145 shall have the same effect as if performed by a notarial officer of the District.

(c)

The signature and title of a person performing a notarial act are prima facie evidence that the signature is genuine and that the person holds the designated title.

History

Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-205, § 4, 37 DCR 8444

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-623.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 3 of the Uniform Law on Notarial Acts.